Connecticut, session 2026, HB05200.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That section 17b-242 of the general statutes be amended to provide
Medicaid reimbursement, to the extent permissible under federal law,
for safety escorts for nurses who provide community-based behavioral
health care.